Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-667.02
Superload, defined.

Superload means a vehicle, or vehicle combination that is transporting a nondivisible load, that is in excess of:

(1) Sixteen feet in width;

(2) One hundred ninety-one inches in height;

(3) One hundred fifty feet in length; or

(4) One hundred sixty thousand pounds in gross weight.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 81.
July 18, 2026